Utah statutes.
32B-4-304.   Violation of title a misdemeanor.

(1)  Unless otherwise provided in this title, a person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if that person violates:

(a)  this chapter; or

(b)  a provision of this title that is expressly identified as a criminal offense.

(2)  This section is not applicable to an adjudicative proceeding under Chapter 3, Disciplinary Actions and Enforcement Act, but only:

(a)  makes a violation described in Subsection (1) a criminal offense; and

(b)  establishes a penalty for a violation described in Subsection (1) that is prosecuted criminally.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

